Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3805
Interview by consular representative.

A consular representative may interview a foreign national minor or minor having multiple nationalities who is a citizen of the country represented by the consulate. The consular representative shall contact the department to arrange for an interview of a foreign national minor or a minor having multiple nationalities.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB92, § 5.